Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7359.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Purpose
The purpose of this act is to bring greater public scrutiny to the public auction sales of real
estate in Rhode Island.
SECTION 2. Title 34 of the General Laws entitled "PROPERTY" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 51
PUBLIC AUCTIONS OF REAL ESTATE
34-51-1. Public auctions of real estate.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, public auctions by any city or town
of real estate or an interest therein shall only be done in person at the time and place specified in
the legal advertisement, and in accordance with Rhode Island statutes that govern said sales, to
include, but not be limited to, the provisions of chapter 9 of title 44.
(b) No public auction of real estate or an interest therein shall be done by electronic or
remote procedures unless authorized by court order of the Rhode Island superior court, after hearing
thereon and a finding that an in-person auction is not feasible under the circumstances of the
specific case.

SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004631
========
LC004631 - Page 2 of 3